dev/adv.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzáéíóúABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZÁÉÍÓÚ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="deg"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="emph"/>
    <sdef n="hpref"/>
    <sdef n="indir"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="past"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="slender"/>
    <sdef n="sub"/>
    <sdef n="com"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="aut"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="dir"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="op"/>
    <sdef n="part"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="cop"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="neg"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="ecl"/>
    <sdef n="strong"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="ifs"/>
    <sdef n="cop"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="dep"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="weak"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="len"/>
    <sdef n="pers"/>
    <sdef n="dat"/>
    <sdef n="defart"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="voc"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pres"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>

    <pardef n="prsubj__prn">
      <e><p><l>mé</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mise</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tú</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tusa</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sé</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>seisean</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sí</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sise</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sinn</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sinne</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>muid</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>muidne</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>muide</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>muidinne</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sibh</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sibhse</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>sibh-se</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>sibh-seo</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>sibh-sin</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>siad</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>siadsan</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>siad-san</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>siad-seo</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>siad-sin</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="probj__prn">
      <e><p><l>mé</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mise</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>thú</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>thusa</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>é</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hé</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="hpref"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eisean</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hí</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="hpref"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ise</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sinn</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sinne</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>muid</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>muidne</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>muide</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>muidinne</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sibh</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sibhse</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>sibh-se</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>sibh-seo</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>sibh-sin</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iad</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hiad</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="hpref"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iadsan</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>iad-san</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>iad-seo</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>iad-sin</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="uaireanta/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bunús/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e><i></i><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
    <e><i></i><par n="probj__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="uaireanta" a="irishfst"><i>uaireanta</i><par n="uaireanta/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bunús" a="irishfst"><i>bunús</i><par n="bunús/__adv"/></e>
